Maine, session 132, LD985.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-A is enacted to read:
§1730-A. Moratorium on ownership or operation of hospitals by private equity
companies and real estate investment trusts
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Hospital" has the same meaning as in Title 36, section 2881, subsection 2.
B. "Indirect ownership interest" means an ownership interest in an entity that has an
ownership interest in a hospital.
C. "Operational control" means to:
(1) Influence or direct the actions or policies of any part of a hospital; or
Page 1 - 132LR1640(03)

(2) Choose, appoint or terminate a member of a board, manager, managing
member, senior employee, consultant or other individual or entity that participates
in the operational oversight of a hospital.
D. "Ownership interest" means possession or equity in capital, stock or profits in a
hospital or ownership of real estate on which a hospital operates.
E. "Private equity company" means an entity whether or not publicly traded that
collects capital investments from individuals or entities.
F. "Real estate investment trust" has the same meaning as in the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, Section 856.
2. Moratorium. A private equity company or real estate investment trust may not
acquire or increase a direct or indirect ownership interest or operational control or financial
control in a hospital in the State.
3. Repeal. This section is repealed June 15, 2026.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act does not apply to any transaction for which an
application for a certificate of need under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 329
has been filed on or before June 1, 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1640(03)